Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska45-1203
Contractor; payment;
payment request; subcontractor; payment;
retainage; payment.

(1) When a contractor
has performed work in accordance with the provisions of a contract with an
owner, the owner shall pay the contractor within thirty days after receipt
by the owner or the owner's representative of a payment request made pursuant
to the contract.

(2) When a subcontractor has performed work in accordance
with the provisions of a subcontract and all conditions precedent to payment
contained in the subcontract have been satisfied, the contractor shall pay
the subcontractor and the subcontractor shall pay his, her, or its subcontractor,
within ten days after receipt by the contractor or subcontractor of each periodic
or final payment, the full amount received for the subcontractor's work and
materials based on work completed or service provided under the subcontract
for which the subcontractor has properly requested payment, if the subcontractor
provides or has provided satisfactory and reasonable assurances of continued
performance and financial responsibility to complete the work.

(3) The owner
or the owner's representative shall release and pay all retainage for work
completed in accordance with the provisions of the contract within forty-five
days after the project, or a designated portion thereof, is substantially
complete. When a subcontractor has performed work in accordance with the provisions
of a subcontract and all conditions precedent to payment contained in the
subcontract have been satisfied, the contractor shall pay all retainage due
such subcontractor within ten days after receipt of the retainage.

Laws 2010, LB552, § 3;

Laws 2014, LB961, § 6.